Maryland, session 2025, SB0394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–405.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0394*

SENATE BILL 394
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT, WITH THE INTENT TO CONCEAL THE DEATH OF
ANOTHER:
(1) FAIL TO CONTACT EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT REGARDING THE DEATH OF THE PERSON;
(2) A CRIME, KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY DISMEMBER, DESTROY,
REMOVE, BURY, DISPOSE OF, OR OTHERWISE OBLITERATE BY ANY MEANS ANY
PORTION OF HUMAN REMAINS; OR
(3) BURY OR OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF A DEAD BODY.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT AID OR ABET ANOTHER IN COMMITTING A
VIOLATION VIOLATING SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 5 YEARS.
(D) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL MAY BE
CONSECUTIVE TO AND NOT OR CONCURRENT WITH ANY OTHER SENTENCE IMPOSED
FOR ANY OTHER CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.